Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-2510
Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Fund; created; use; investment; rules and regulations.

(1) The Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the department and shall consist of transfers pursuant to section 79-3501, repayments of grant funds, and interest payments received in the course of administering the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program Act. The fund shall be used to carry out the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the department, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program Act.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 24;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 99;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 169.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.